Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 38

Department of Agriculture

Subchapter 1

25-38-201. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

Agriculture accounts for thirteen billion dollars ($13,000,000,000) or one-fifth (1/5) of the gross state product of Arkansas;

Two hundred ninety-one thousand (291,000) Arkansas jobs directly involve or operate in support of agriculture;

Agriculture and agriculture-related jobs account for twenty-three percent (23%) of all employment in Arkansas;

Responsibility for supporting agriculture in Arkansas is spread across six (6) state agencies;

Marketing of the agricultural products of Arkansas is made extremely difficult by the diffusion of responsibility across six (6) state agencies; and

Marketing of the agricultural products of Arkansas would be vastly improved if a central office were devoted to creating, publicizing, and sustaining an information network for Arkansas farmers and ranchers.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 1.

25-38-202. Creation — Appointment of secretary — Definition.

There is created the Department of Agriculture as a cabinet-level department under § 25-43-201.

The executive head of the department shall be the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture.

The secretary shall be selected by the Arkansas Agriculture Board, and the name shall be submitted to the Governor and the Senate for confirmation. The secretary shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The secretary may:

Delegate to the employees of the Department of Agriculture any of the powers or duties of the department required to administer the:

Statutory duties; and

Rules, orders, or directives promulgated or issued by the:

Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board;

Arkansas Agriculture Board;

Arkansas Boll Weevil Eradication Committee;

Arkansas Bureau of Standards;

Arkansas Farm Mediation Office;

Arkansas Fire Ant Advisory Board;

Arkansas Forestry Commission;

Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board;

Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

Arkansas Seed Arbitration Committee;

Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters;

Arkansas State Board of Registration for Professional Soil Classifiers;

Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program;

Commission on Water Well Construction;

Litter Utilization Committee;

Ouachita River Commission;

Private Wetland and Riparian Zone Creation, Restoration, and Conservation Committee;

Red River Compact Commission;

State Plant Board;

Veterinary Medical Examining Board;

Wetlands Technical Advisory Committee; or

Other state entities under the Department of Agriculture;

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture as a cabinet-level department under §25-43-201” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (a); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Agriculture” for “Secretary of the Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (b)(1), inserted “and the Senate” in (b)(2); and added (b)(3) and (b)(4).

Administer the departments, institutions, other agencies, or parts of departments, institutions, or other agencies transferred to the department under § 25-38-211;

Coordinate all existing programs and create any new programs that will enhance the marketing of the state's agricultural products to intrastate, national, and international markets;

Establish a clearinghouse for collecting, correlating, analyzing, and interpreting marketing and educational information and data concerning the needs of and resources for agriculture, aquaculture, horticulture, forestry, and kindred industries;

Develop a website devoted to marketing and education concerning agriculture, aquaculture, horticulture, forestry, and kindred industries, including a distinctive logo publicizing products as “Grown in Arkansas”;

Encourage the organization of neighborhood and county agricultural clubs and associations;

Coordinate the various activities of the department with those of the federal government and other states on matters pertaining to agriculture, aquaculture, horticulture, forestry, and kindred industries and enter into agreements for that purpose;

Coordinate with existing programs concerning agriculture, aquaculture, horticulture, forestry, and kindred industries with the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas;

Make all contracts and grants and employ, to the extent funds are available, such personnel as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Assist other departments, agencies, and institutions of the state and federal governments, when so requested, by performing services in conformity with the purposes of this chapter;

Establish a uniform allowance program for certain staff and field employees;

Prepare and submit annually to the Governor a report of the department’s expenditures and accomplishments, including information from all entities administered by the department; and

Designate employees who shall have the powers of peace officers or institutional law enforcement officers in the enforcement of the criminal laws of this state.

A civil penalty assessed and collected under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 741, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect consumers from misleading and false labeling of agricultural products that are edible by humans byinitiating this act”.

Publisher's Notes. See also §2-1-301 et seq., enacted by Acts 2019, No. 501, concerning labeling of agricultural products that are edible by humans and providing for civil penalties.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 741 added the (a) designation; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in the section heading and the introductory language of (a); substituted “§25-38-211” for “§§25-38-204 and25-38-205” in (a)(1); substituted “Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas” for “University of Arkansas Division of Agriculture” in (a)(7); and added (a)(10) through (12).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning type 1 transfers of various agricultural agencies, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2; 2007, No. 533, § 1.

Publisher's Note. This section, concerning the Division of Agricultural Development of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and coordination of marketing programs, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1060, § 19.The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2.

All administrative functions, including without limitation the human resource and accounting operations, of the following boards, commissions, bureaus, committees, programs, and offices shall be administered under the direction and supervision of the Department of Agriculture:

The Arkansas Boll Weevil Eradication Committee;

The Arkansas Fire Ant Advisory Board;

The Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board;

The Arkansas Seed Arbitration Committee;

The Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program;

The Litter Utilization Committee;

The Ouachita River Commission;

The Arkansas Agriculture Board;

The Private Wetland and Riparian Zone Creation, Restoration, and Conservation Committee; and

The Wetlands Technical Advisory Committee.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “personnel, administrative functions” in the section heading; rewrote the introductory language of (a); added (a)(4) through (a)(22); in (b), inserted “committees, bureaus, programs, and offices”, substituted “administrative functions under subsection (a)” for “administration of human resource and accounting operations under subsection (a)”, and substituted “the administrative functions of the boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, or offices” for “their human resource and accounting operations”; and added (c) and (d).

Two (2) members, at least one (1) of whom shall be actively engaged in farming, from the State Plant Board;

Two (2) members, at least one (1) of whom shall be actively engaged in farming, from the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

Two (2) members from the Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

Two (2) members from the Arkansas Forestry Commission; and

One (1) member actively engaged in farming from the Arkansas Rural Development Commission.

Eleven (11) members, appointed by the Governor with the consent of the Senate as follows:

Three (3) members who are actively engaged in growing rice, cotton, or small grains, including, but not limited to, corn, sorghum, soybeans, and wheat;

Three (3) members who are actively involved in at least one (1) of the following areas of the agricultural industry:

Plant food, agricultural chemicals, or seed merchandising;

Meat processing;

Grain processing;

Domestic food products, processing, and global marketing;

Aquaculture; and

The Arkansas Livestock Marketing Association; and

Five (5) members as follows:

One (1) member who is actively engaged in producing beef;

One (1) member who is actively engaged in producing swine;

One (1) member who is actively engaged in dairy farming;

One (1) member who is actively engaged in producing poultry; and

One (1) member who is actively engaged in producing wine, grapes, fruits, or vegetables; and

The Vice President for Agriculture of the University of Arkansas System;

The Dean of Agriculture and Technology of Arkansas State University;

The Dean of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff;

A representative of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences who is actively involved in nutrition teaching or research, or both;

A representative of the University of Arkansas at Monticello;

The President of the Arkansas Association of Conservation Districts;

A representative of Southern Arkansas University; and

A representative of Arkansas Tech University.

The Arkansas Agriculture Board shall advise the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture on all matters concerning agriculture, aquaculture, horticulture, and kindred industries.

The Arkansas Agriculture Board shall meet at least quarterly and shall fix a regular date for the quarterly meeting.

(1)The members of the Arkansas Agriculture Board appointed by the Governor shall serve staggered terms of four (4) years, to be determined at the first meeting of the Arkansas Agriculture Board by lot in a manner to result, as far as possible, in an equal number of terms expiring each year.

(1)Vacancies due to death, resignation, refusal to serve, or other causes among members of the Arkansas Agriculture Board appointed by the Governor shall be filled by appointment by the Governor of a qualified person to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

(1)State agency members of the Arkansas Agriculture Board shall receive no additional salary or compensation for their services as members of the Arkansas Agriculture Board, but they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-902, to the extent funds are available.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 126, provided:

“(a)Except as provided in this section, provisions of this act altering the appointment structure of a task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity shall not shorten the term of any member of the task force, commission, committee, or other governmental entity but shall be implemented by the filling of vacancies.

“(b)The Governor may remove a member of the Arkansas Governor's Mansion Commission who was appointed to the commission before the effective date [May 23, 2016] of Section 85 of this act.”

Amendments. The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “twenty (20)” for “twenty-one (21)” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “Nine (9)” for “Ten (10)” in (a)(1); and deleted (a)(1)(F).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (b).

Hire department personnel, unless otherwise provided by law; and

Perform or assign duties assigned to the Department of Agriculture.

(A)When exercising his or her duties with regards to the State Plant Board, the secretary shall work in consultation with the Director of the State Plant Board and the State Plant Board.

As used in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section, “consultation” means coordinating with, giving input, reviewing, and recommending, but shall not require approval or consent.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 4.

25-38-203. Department of Agriculture — Powers and duties.

The Department of Agriculture shall:

The department may:

Promulgate rules regarding the labeling of horticultural, viticultural, livestock, and poultry products that are edible by humans, including without limitation rice;

Receive and investigate complaints regarding alleged violations of the rules promulgated under subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and

(A)Assess a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of the rules promulgated under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2; 2019, No. 741, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5.

25-38-204. [Repealed.]

25-38-206. Transfer of personnel, administrative functions, human resources, and accounting offices.

The State Plant Board;

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission;

The Arkansas Forestry Commission;

The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission;

The Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters;

The Veterinary Medical Examining Board;

The Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board;

The Commission on Water Well Construction;

The Red River Compact Commission;

The Arkansas Bureau of Standards;

The Arkansas State Board of Registration for Professional Soil Classifiers;

The Arkansas Farm Mediation Office;

The boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, and offices subject to transfer of the administrative functions under subsection (a) of this section shall make available to the department all records of whatever type concerning the administrative functions of the boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, or offices.

(1)All employees of the boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, or offices transferred under §25-38-211 and subsection (a) of this section shall be employees of the department, unless otherwise provided by law.

All job descriptions, duties, salaries, and benefits shall be determined by the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture as consistent with Arkansas law, unless otherwise provided by law.

All programs and positions funded by special funds allocated by law to the boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, or offices subject to the transfer under §25-38-211 and subsection (a) of this section shall continue to be used for the designated purposes of the programs and positions.

The department shall provide all administrative support, employment needs, and staff to carry out the rules, directives, and orders promulgated or issued by the state entities transferred under subsection (a) of this section and §25-38-211, unless otherwise provided by law.

“Administrative functions” does not include the promulgation of rules or issuance of orders on behalf of any of the entities transferred under subsection (a) of this section and §25-38-211.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 7.

25-38-207. Arkansas Agriculture Board — Creation — Members — Organization — Duties.

The Arkansas Agriculture Board is created to consist of twenty (20) voting members and eight (8) nonvoting ex officio members, as follows:

Nine (9) members, appointed by their respective boards, who sit on one (1) of the following boards or commissions:

Eight (8) nonvoting ex officio members, as follows:

The members appointed by the Governor shall serve no more than two (2) terms.

A person so appointed is eligible for appointment to a subsequent full term on the Arkansas Agriculture Board.

The members appointed by the Governor may receive expense reimbursement from funds made available for that purpose in accordance with §25-16-902, to the extent funds are available.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2; 2007, No. 469, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 88; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 88; 2019, No. 910, § 122.

25-38-208. Agencies not affected.

The establishment of the Department of Agriculture shall in no way affect the duties, powers, or operations of the following boards and councils:

Arkansas Beef Council;

Arkansas Catfish Promotion Board;

Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board;

Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board;

Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board; or

Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in the introductory language.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning transfer of the Division of Land Surveys, was repealed by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 150. The section was derived from Acts 2007, No. 752, § 1.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1978, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 123.

25-38-209. [Repealed.]

The Department of Agriculture shall:

Evaluate the potential economic benefits to Arkansas and Arkansas farmers of entering into agricultural exchanges with Israel and other countries that will foster the development of trade, mutual assistance, and business relations between Arkansas and the other country; and

Annually report the department's findings under subdivision (1) of this section to the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1501, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 124.

25-38-211. Transfers of certain agricultural boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, and offices.

As provided in this section and in §§ 25-38-206 and 25-43-202, the following boards, commissions, committees, bureaus, programs, or offices, or parts thereof, are transferred by a cabinet-level department transfer under § 25-43-103(3) to the Department of Agriculture:

The Abandoned Pesticide Advisory Board, created under § 8-7-1204;

The Arkansas Agriculture Board, created under § 25-38-207;

The Arkansas Bureau of Standards, created under § 4-18-301 et seq.;

The Arkansas Boll Weevil Eradication Committee, created under § 2-16-612;

The Arkansas Farm Mediation Office, created under § 2-7-201;

The Arkansas Fire Ant Advisory Board, created under § 2-16-701;

The Arkansas Forestry Commission, created under § 15-31-101;

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, created under § 2-33-101;

The Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board, created under § 2-10-103;

The Arkansas Natural Resources Commission, created under § 15-20-201;

The Arkansas Seed Arbitration Committee, created under § 2-23-104;

The Arkansas State Board of Registration for Foresters, created under § 17-31-201;

The Arkansas State Board of Registration for Professional Soil Classifiers, created under § 17-47-201;

The Arkansas Unpaved Roads Program, created under § 14-305-104;

The Commission on Water Well Construction, created under § 17-50-201;

The Litter Utilization Committee, created under § 15-20-1110;

The Private Wetland and Riparian Zone Creation, Restoration, and Conservation Committee, created under § 26-51-1503;

The Ouachita River Commission, created under § 15-23-803;

The Red River Compact Commission, created under § 15-23-501;

The State Plant Board, created under § 2-16-206;

The Veterinary Medical Examining Board, created under § 17-101-201; and

The Wetlands Technical Advisory Committee, created under § 15-22-1003.

The transfer under subsection (a) of this section supersedes previous transfers, including without limitation the transfers under § 25-38-204 [repealed].

For purposes of this section, the Department of Agriculture shall be considered a principal department as established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

The transferred entities shall be administered under the direction and supervision of the department but shall continue to exercise their statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions as before the transfer, including without limitation the promulgation of rules, the collection of fees, and the creation of programs.

All revenue and future revenue, including without limitation cash funds, special revenue, trust funds, trust fund income, federal grants, aid, reimbursements, nonrevenue receipts, and other moneys held in accounts by the transferred boards, commissions, bureaus, programs, committees, or offices, including without limitation unexpended balances that may be carried forward, shall continue to be held in the accounts and shall be used solely for the purposes for which the revenue was collected as provided by law.

All records, personnel, and unexpended balances of state appropriations or allocations, including the functions of budgeting and purchasing, are transferred to the department.

All real property owned in fee simple by a transferred state entity, except as set out in subdivision (g)(2) of this section, shall remain in the name of the state entity subject to a cabinet-level department transfer under § 25-38-211, to be administered by the department.

All real or personal property owned by the State Plant Board shall remain in the name of the State Plant Board and shall be administered by the State Plant Board.

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 153, § 4. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-39-101. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 1.

25-39-102. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-103. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-201. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-202. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-203. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-204. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-205. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-206. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-207. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-208. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-209. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-210. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-211. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-212. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-213. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-214. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-215. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-216. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-217. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-218. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-219. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-220. Acts 2005, No. 2218, § 2.

25-39-301. Acts 2005, No. 2252, § 1.

25-39-302. Acts 2005, No. 2252, § 2.

25-39-303. Acts 2005, No. 2252, § 3.

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1484, § 11. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-40-101. Acts 2005, No. 2290, § 1.

25-40-102. Acts 2005, No. 2290, § 1.

25-40-103. Acts 2005, No. 2290, § 1.

25-40-104. Acts 2005, No. 2290, § 1.

25-40-105. Acts 2005, No. 2290, § 1.

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, two (2) of whom shall represent and be residents of the Third and Fourth Congressional Districts of Arkansas, respectively, and a third who shall represent the state at large.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1583, § 2, provided:

“At the first meeting of the committee, the members shall draw lots for terms so that three (3) members will serve for a term of one (1) year; three (3) members will serve for a term of two (2) years; and three (3) members will serve for a term of three (3) years.”

To develop, coordinate, and advise the Governor and the General Assembly of appropriate ceremonies and activities throughout the state relating to the observance of the Daisy Gatson Bates holiday.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 8.

Subchapter 2

— Department of Agriculture

25-38-205. [Repealed.]

25-38-210. Agricultural exchanges.